Alabama, session 2026rs, SB75.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
19 Section 1. Sections 39-2-2, Code of Alabama 1975, as
20 last amended by Act 2025-383, 2025 Regular Session, is amended
21 to read as follows:
22 "§39-2-2
23 (a)(1) Before entering into any contract for a public
24 works involving an amount in excess of one hundred thousand
25 dollars ($100,000), the awarding authority shall advertise for
26 sealed bids, except as provided in subsection (k).
27 (2)a. If the awarding authority is the state, a county,
28 or an instrumentality thereof, it shall advertise for sealed
Page 1

or an instrumentality thereof, it shall advertise for sealed
SB75 Engrossed
29 bids at least once each week for three consecutive weeks in a
30 newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties in
31 which the improvement, or some part thereof, is to be made.
32 b.1. If the awarding authority is a municipality, or an
33 instrumentality thereof, it shall advertise for sealed bids at
34 least once in a newspaper of general circulation published in
35 the municipality where the awarding authority is located.
36 2. If no newspaper is published in the municipality,
37 the awarding authority shall advertise by posting notice
38 thereof on a bulletin board maintained outside the purchasing
39 office and in any other manner and for the length of time as
40 may be determined. In addition to bulletin board notice, the
41 awarding authority shall also send the notice by U.S. mail or
42 electronic mail to the Department of Finance for publication
43 of the advertisement on the centralized website maintained by
44 the department as further described in subsection (c).
45 (3) The advertisements shall briefly describe the
46 improvement, state that plans and specifications for the
47 improvement are on file for examination in a designated office
48 of the awarding authority, state the procedure for obtaining
49 plans and specifications, state the time and place in which
50 bids shall be received and opened, and identify whether
51 prequalification is required and where all written
52 prequalification information is available for review.
53 (4) All bids shall be opened publicly at the advertised
54 time and place.
55 (5) No public work involving a sum in excess of one
56 hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) shall be split into parts
Page 2

hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) shall be split into parts
SB75 Engrossed
57 involving sums of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or
58 less for the purpose of evading the requirements of this
59 section.
60 (b)(1) An awarding authority may let contracts for
61 public works involving one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000)
62 or less with or without advertising or sealed bids.
63 (2) Notwithstanding the advertising requirements of
64 subdivision (a)(2), an awarding authority may enter into a
65 contract for public works if: (i) the awarding authority
66 submitted the advertisement for sealed bids for the contract
67 in accordance with subdivision (a)(2); and (ii) the
68 advertisement was published for at least three weeks, or if
69 the awarding authority is a municipality or instrumentality
70 thereof for at least seven consecutive calendar days, on a
71 centralized website maintained by the Department of Finance as
72 further described in subsection (c).
73 (3) If the awarding authority under subdivision (2) is
74 the Department of Transportation, the Department of Finance
75 may alternatively satisfy the requirements of subdivision
76 (2)(ii) by publishing the advertisement on its publicly
77 accessible website for at least three weeks.
78 (4) If the awarding authority under subdivision (2) is
79 a county or instrumentality thereof, the county or
80 instrumentality may alternatively satisfy the requirements of
81 subdivision (2)(ii) by publishing the advertisement in
82 accordance with the procedures submitted by the Association of
83 County Engineers of Alabama and approved by the Department of
84 Examiners of Public Accounts as authorized by general law.
Page 3

Examiners of Public Accounts as authorized by general law.
SB75 Engrossed
85 (c) The Department of Finance shall establish and
86 maintain a centralized website or digital platform to provide
87 publicly accessible notice of advertisements for sealed bids
88 pursuant to this section. The department may further provide
89 for the administration and operations related thereto by the
90 adoption of administrative rules, including, but not limited
91 to, the assessment of fees to awarding authorities for the
92 posting of advertisements to cover the implementation and
93 maintenance cost of the website or digital platform.
94 (d) All contracts for public works entered into in
95 violation of this title shall be void and violative of public
96 policy. Anyone who willfully violates this chapter concerning
97 public works shall be guilty of a Class C felony.
98 (e)(1) Excluded from the operation of this title shall
99 be contracts with persons who shall perform only
100 architectural, engineering, construction management, program
101 management, or project management services in support of the
102 public works and who shall not engage in actual construction,
103 repair, renovation, or maintenance of the public works with
104 their own forces, by contract, subcontract, purchase order,
105 lease, or otherwise.
106 (2)a. Excluded from operation of the bidding
107 requirements in this title are contracts for the purchase of
108 any heating or air conditioning units or systems by any
109 awarding authority subject to Chapter 13B of Title 16, Article
110 3, commencing with Section 41-16-50 of Chapter 16 of Title 41,
111 or Article 5, commencing with Section 41-4-110 of Chapter 4 of
112 Title 41, provided the contract is entered into with an
Page 4

Title 41, provided the contract is entered into with an
SB75 Engrossed
113 Alabama vendor who has been granted approved vendor status for
114 the sale of heating or air conditioning units or systems as a
115 part of a purchasing cooperative, and each of the following
116 occur:
117 1. The heating or air conditioning unit or system being
118 purchased is available as a result of a competitive bid
119 process conducted by a governmental entity which has been that
120 complies with the Alabama competitive bid law applicable to
121 the awarding authority and is approved by the Department of
122 Examiners of Public Accounts.
123 2. The purchase of the heating or air conditioning unit
124 or system is not available on the state purchasing program at
125 the time or the purchase under the purchasing cooperative is
126 available at a price that is equal to or less than that
127 available through the state purchasing program.
128 3. The entity entering into the contract for the
129 purchase of the heating or air conditioning unit or system has
130 been notified by the Department of Examiners of Public
131 Accounts that the competitive bid process utilized by the
132 cooperative program offering the goods complies with this
133 subdivision.
134 4. Upon request, the vendor has provided the purchasing
135 entity with a report of sales made under this subdivision
136 during the previous 12-month period, to include a general
137 description of the heating or air conditioning units and
138 systems sold, the number of units sold per entity, and the
139 purchase price of the units.
140 b. The exemption from the requirement to use sealed
Page 5

b. The exemption from the requirement to use sealed
SB75 Engrossed
141 bids for the purchase of heating or air conditioning units or
142 systems authorized by this section shall not serve to exempt
143 any public works project from the remaining provisions of this
144 chapter, including, but not limited to, design, installation,
145 and review requirements, compliance with all applicable codes,
146 laws, specifications, and standards, and the compensation of
147 engineers, architects, or others as mandated by state law or
148 rule.
149 (f)(1) In case of an emergency for which a delay in
150 remedying would cause immediate harm to a person or public
151 property, contracts may be let to the extent necessary to meet
152 the emergency without public advertisement or bidding.
153 (2) In case of an emergency affecting public health,
154 safety, or convenience, as declared in writing by the awarding
155 authority, setting forth the nature of the danger to the
156 public health, safety, or convenience which would result from
157 delay, contracts may be let to the extent necessary to meet
158 the emergency without public advertisement.
159 (3) Any action taken under subdivision (1) or (2), and
160 the reasons for the action taken, shall immediately be made
161 public by the awarding authority and published in writing.
162 (g) No awarding authority may specify in the plans and
163 specifications for the improvement the use of materials,
164 products, systems, or services by a sole source unless all of
165 the following requirements are met:
166 (1) Except for contracts involving the construction,
167 reconstruction, renovation, or replacement of public roads,
168 bridges, and water and sewer facilities, the awarding
Page 6

bridges, and water and sewer facilities, the awarding
SB75 Engrossed
169 authority can document to the satisfaction of the Division of
170 Real Property Management of the Department of Finance, or in
171 the case of an educational institution or state educational
172 institution as provided pursuant to Sections 41-4-353 and
173 41-4-400, to the satisfaction of its governing board, that the
174 sole source product, material, system, or service is of an
175 indispensable nature for the improvement, that there are no
176 other viable alternatives, and that only this particular
177 product, material, system, or service fulfills the function
178 for which it is needed.
179 (2) The sole source specification has been recommended
180 by the architect or engineer of record as an indispensable
181 item for which there is no other viable alternative.
182 (3) All information substantiating the use of a sole
183 source specification, including the recommendation of the
184 architect or engineer of record, shall be documented and made
185 available for examination in the office of the awarding
186 authority at the time of advertisement for sealed bids.
187 (h) If a proposed public works project is acknowledged
188 in writing by the Alabama Homeland Security Department as: (i)
189 having a direct impact on the security or safety of persons or
190 facilities; and (ii) requiring confidential handling for the
191 protection of such persons or facilities, contracts may be let
192 without public advertisement but with the taking of informal
193 bids otherwise consistent with the requirements of this title
194 and the requirements of maintaining confidentiality. Records
195 of bidding and award shall not be disclosed to the public and
196 shall remain confidential.
Page 7

shall remain confidential.
SB75 Engrossed
197 (i) If a pre-bid meeting is held, the pre-bid meeting
198 shall be held at least seven days prior to the bid opening
199 except when the project has been declared an emergency in
200 accordance with subsection (f).
201 (j) The awarding authority may not offer a contract for
202 bidding unless confirmation of any applicable grant has been
203 received and any required matching funds have been secured by
204 or are available to the awarding authority.
205 (k) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the Department of
206 Transportation may enter into contracts for road construction
207 or road maintenance projects that do not involve more than two
208 hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) without advertising
209 for sealed bids, provided the project is listed on the
210 publicly accessible website of the department for at least
211 seven calendar days before entering into the contract. The
212 total cost of all projects not subject to advertising and
213 sealed bids pursuant to this subsection may not exceed one
214 million dollars ($1,000,000) in the aggregate per year.
215 (l) For the purposes of this chapter, sealed bids may
216 also be solicited and submitted through electronic means
217 including, but not limited to, electrical, digital, magnetic,
218 optical, electromagnetic, or any other similar technology,
219 provided that the awarding authority adopts rules and policies
220 to ensure that all electronic submissions are transmitted
221 securely and bids remainedremain sealed until bid opening.
222 (m)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any
223 entity subject to this chapter thatwhich is an awarding
224 authority of a contract for public works, by resolution or
Page 8

authority of a contract for public works, by resolution or
SB75 Engrossed
225 board action, may purchase materials or equipment pursuant to
226 a cooperative purchasing agreement under Division 7 of Article
227 5 of Chapter 4 of Title 41, or pursuant to the requirements of
228 Section 41-16-51(a)(14), (16), (17), (18), or (19), as
229 applicable, even when those materials or equipment are
230 otherwise part of the contract for public works subject to the
231 requirements of this title. The materials or equipment being
232 purchased pursuant to this section shall have been awarded
233 through a competitive bid process that complies with the
234 Alabama competitive bid law applicable to that awarding
235 authority.
236 (2) Except for those materials or equipment described
237 in subdivision (1), the remaining portion of the public works
238 project shall be subject to the requirements of this title,
239 even if the remaining portion would involve an amount less
240 than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) as a result of
241 the exclusion of the purchase of the materials or equipment as
242 described in subdivision (1)."
243 Section 2. Section 41-16-51, Code of Alabama 1975, is
244 amended to read as follows:
245 "§41-16-51
246 (a) Competitive bids for entities subject to this
247 article shall not be required for utility services, the rates
248 for which are fixed by law, regulation, or ordinance, and the
249 competitive bidding requirements of this article shall not
250 apply to any of the following:
251 (1) The purchase of insurance.
252 (2) The purchase of ballots and supplies for conducting
Page 9

(2) The purchase of ballots and supplies for conducting
SB75 Engrossed
253 any primary, general, special, or municipal election.
254 (3) Contracts for securing services of attorneys,
255 physicians, architects, teachers, superintendents of
256 construction, artists, appraisers, engineers, consultants,
257 certified public accountants, public accountants, or other
258 individuals possessing a high degree of professional skill
259 where the personality of the individual plays a decisive part.
260 (4) Contracts of employment in the regular civil
261 service.
262 (5) Contracts for fiscal or financial advice or
263 services.
264 (6) Purchases of products made or manufactured by blind
265 or visually impaired individuals under the direction or
266 supervision of the Alabama Institute for Deaf and Blind in
267 accordance with Chapter 2 of Title 21.
268 (7) Purchases of maps or photographs from any federal
269 agency.
270 (8) Purchases of computer programs, software
271 applications, manuscripts, books, maps, pamphlets,
272 periodicals, and library or research electronic databases of
273 manuscripts, books, maps, pamphlets, or periodicals.
274 (9) The selection of paying agents and trustees for any
275 security issued by a public body.
276 (10) Existing contracts up for renewal for sanitation
277 or solid waste collection, recycling, and disposal between
278 municipalities or counties, or both, and those providing the
279 service.
280 (11) Purchases of computer and word processing hardware
Page 10

(11) Purchases of computer and word processing hardware
SB75 Engrossed
281 when the hardware is the only type that is compatible with
282 hardware already owned by the entity taking bids and custom
283 software.
284 (12) Professional services contracts for codification
285 and publication of the laws and ordinances of municipalities
286 and counties.
287 (13) Contractual services and purchases of commodities
288 for which there is only one vendor or supplier and contractual
289 services and purchases of personal property which by their
290 very nature are impossible to award by competitive bidding.
291 (14) Purchases of dirt, sand, or gravel by a county
292 governing body from in-county property owners in order to
293 supply a county project in which the materials will be used.
294 The material shall be delivered to the project site by county
295 employees and equipment used only on project components
296 conducted exclusively by county employees.
297 (15) Contractual services and purchases of products
298 related to, or having an impact upon, security plans,
299 procedures, assessments, measures, or systems, or the security
300 or safety of individuals, structures, facilities, or
301 infrastructures.
302 (16) Subject to the limitations in this subdivision,
303 purchases, leases, or lease/purchases of goods or services,
304 other than voice or data wireless communication services, made
305 as a part of the purchasing cooperative sponsored by the
306 National Association of Counties, its successor organization,
307 or any other national or regional governmental cooperative
308 purchasing program. The purchases, leases, or lease/purchases
Page 11

purchasing program. The purchases, leases, or lease/purchases
SB75 Engrossed
309 may only be made if all of the following occur:
310 a. The goods or services being purchased, including
311 those purchased through a lease/purchase agreement, or leased
312 are available as a result of a competitive bid process
313 conducted by a governmental entity whose award complies with
314 Section 41-16-50(a) and is approved by the Department of
315 Examiners of Public Accounts for each bid.
316 b. The goods or services are either not at the time
317 available to counties on the state purchasing program or are
318 available at a price equal to or less than that on the state
319 purchasing program.
320 c. The purchase, lease, or lease/purchase is made
321 through a participating Alabama vendor holding an Alabama
322 business license if such a vendor exists.
323 d. The entity purchasing, leasing, or lease/purchasing
324 goods or services under this subdivision has been notified by
325 the Department of Examiners of Public Accounts that the
326 competitive bid process utilized by the cooperative program
327 offering the goods complies with this subdivision. In
328 addition, upon request, a vendor shall provide the entity
329 purchasing, leasing, or lease/purchasing goods or services
330 equaling thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) or more which are
331 made under this subdivision during the previous 12 months a
332 report of the sales, leases, and lease/purchases. The report
333 shall include a general description of the goods or services;
334 the number of units sold, leased, and leased/purchased per
335 entity; and the price of units purchased, leased, or
336 leased/purchased.
Page 12

leased/purchased.
SB75 Engrossed
337 (17) Purchases of goods or services, other than
338 wireless communication services, whether voice or data, from
339 vendors that have been awarded a current and valid Government
340 Services Administration contract. Any purchase made pursuant
341 to this subdivision shall be under the same terms and
342 conditions as provided in the Government Services
343 Administration contract. Prices paid for the goods and
344 services, other than wireless communication services, whether
345 voice or data, may not exceed the amount provided in the
346 Government Services Administration contract.
347 (18) Purchases of goods or services from vendors that
348 have been awarded a current and valid statewide contract
349 listed on the Alabama Buys e-procurement system. Any purchase
350 made pursuant to this subdivision shall be under the same
351 terms and conditions as provided in the statewide contract.
352 Prices paid for the goods and services may not exceed the
353 amount provided in the statewide contract.
354 (19) Purchases of goods or services between
355 governmental entities of the state, as authorized by Section
356 11-1-10.
357 (20) Purchases of goods or services between a
358 municipality and a governmental entity, as defined in Section
359 8-38-2.
360 (b) This article shall not apply to:
361 (1) Any purchases of products where the price of the
362 products is already regulated and established by state law.
363 (2) Purchases made by individual schools of the county
364 or municipal public school systems from monies other than
Page 13

or municipal public school systems from monies other than
SB75 Engrossed
365 those raised by taxation or received through appropriations
366 from state or county sources.
367 (3) The purchase, lease, sale, construction,
368 installation, acquisition, improvement, enlargement, or
369 expansion of any building or structure or other facility
370 designed or intended for lease or sale by a medical clinic
371 board organized under Chapter 58 of Title 11.
372 (4) The purchase, lease, or other acquisition of
373 machinery, equipment, supplies, and other personal property or
374 services by a medical clinic board organized under Chapter 58
375 of Title 11.
376 (5) Purchases for public hospitals and nursing homes
377 operated by the governing boards of instrumentalities of the
378 state, counties, and municipalities.
379 (6) Contracts for the purchase, lease, sale,
380 construction, installation, acquisition, improvement,
381 enlargement, or extension of any plant, building, structure,
382 or other facility or any machinery, equipment, furniture, or
383 furnishings therefor designed or intended for lease or sale
384 for industrial development, other than public utilities, under
385 Division 1 of Article 4 of Chapter 54 of Title 11, or Article
386 2 of Chapter 54 of Title 11, or any other law or amendment to
387 the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, authorizing the
388 construction of plants or other facilities for industrial
389 development or for the construction and equipment of buildings
390 for public building authorities under Chapter 15 of Title 11
391 or Chapter 56 of Title 11.
392 (7) The purchase of equipment, supplies, or materials
Page 14

(7) The purchase of equipment, supplies, or materials
SB75 Engrossed
393 needed, used, and consumed in the normal and routine operation
394 of any waterworks system, sanitary sewer system, gas system,
395 or electric system, or any two or more thereof, that are owned
396 by municipalities, counties, or public corporations, boards,
397 or authorities that are agencies, departments, or
398 instrumentalities of municipalities or counties and no part of
399 the operating expenses of which system or systems, during the
400 then current fiscal year, have been paid from revenues derived
401 from taxes or from appropriations of the state, a county, or a
402 municipality.
403 (8) Purchases made by local housing authorities,
404 organized and existing under Chapter 1 of Title 24, from
405 monies other than those raised by state, county, or city
406 taxation or received through appropriations from state,
407 county, or city sources.
408 (9) The purchase of services to aid in the prevention
409 and detection of criminal activity by law enforcement agencies
410 and community-oriented policing programs.
411 (c) The state trade schools, state junior colleges,
412 state colleges, and universities under the supervision and
413 control of the State Board of Education, the district boards
414 of education of independent school districts two-year and
415 four-year institutions of higher education, the county
416 commissions, and the governing bodies of the municipalities of
417 the state shall establish and maintain purchasing facilities
418 and procedures as may be necessary to carry out the intent and
419 purpose of this article by complying with the requirements for
420 competitive bidding in the operation and management of each
Page 15

competitive bidding in the operation and management of each
SB75 Engrossed
421 state trade school, state junior college, state college, or
422 university under the supervision and control of the State
423 Board of Education, the district boards of education of
424 independent school districts two-year and four-year
425 institution of higher education, the county commissions, and
426 the governing bodies of the municipalities of the state and
427 the governing boards of instrumentalities of counties and
428 municipalities, including waterworks boards, sewer boards, gas
429 boards, and other like utility boards and commissions.
430 (d) Contracts entered into in violation of this article
431 shall be void and any individual who violates this article
432 shall be guilty of a Class C felony."
433 Section 3. Section 16-13B-2, Code of Alabama 1975, is
434 amended to read as follows:
435 "§16-13B-2
436 (a) Competitive bids shall not be required for utility
437 services for county or city boards of education, the rates for
438 which are fixed by law, regulation, or ordinance, and the
439 competitive bidding requirements of this chapter shall not
440 apply to:
441 (1) The purchase of insurance.
442 (2) Contracts for securing services of attorneys,
443 physicians, architects, teachers, superintendents of
444 construction, artists, appraisers, engineers, consultants,
445 certified public accountants, public accountants, or other
446 individuals possessing a high degree of professional skill
447 where the personality of the individual plays a decisive part.
448 (3) Contracts of employment in the regular civil
Page 16

(3) Contracts of employment in the regular civil
SB75 Engrossed
449 service.
450 (4) Contracts for fiscal or financial advice or
451 services.
452 (5) Purchases of products made or manufactured by blind
453 or visually impaired individuals under the direction or
454 supervision of the Alabama Institute for Deaf and Blind in
455 accordance with Sections 21-2-1 to 21-2-4, inclusive.
456 (6) Purchases of maps or photographs from any federal
457 agency.
458 (7) Purchases of manuscripts, books, instructional
459 materials, maps, pamphlets, or periodicals, or the electronic
460 version thereof. The exemption for the purchase of
461 instructional materials shall only include those purchases
462 from a current vetted and approved list published by the State
463 Department of Education.
464 (8) The selection of paying agents and trustees for any
465 security issued by a public body.
466 (9) Existing contracts up for renewal for sanitation or
467 solid waste collection, recycling, or disposal and those
468 providing the service.
469 (10) Purchases of computer and word processing hardware
470 when the hardware is the only type that is compatible with
471 hardware already owned by the entity taking bids and custom
472 software.
473 (11) Contractual services and purchases of commodities
474 for which there is only one vendor or supplier and contractual
475 services and purchases of personal property which by their
476 very nature are impossible to award by competitive bidding.
Page 17

very nature are impossible to award by competitive bidding.
SB75 Engrossed
477 (12) Contractual services and purchases of products
478 related to, or having an impact upon, security plans,
479 procedures, assessments, measures, or systems, or the security
480 or safety of persons, structures, facilities, or
481 infrastructures.
482 (13) Purchases, leases, or lease/purchases of goods or
483 services, other than voice or data wireless communication
484 services, made as a part of any purchasing cooperative
485 sponsored by the National Association of Counties, its
486 successor organization, or any other national or regional
487 governmental cooperative purchasing program. The purchases,
488 leases, or lease/purchases may only be made if all of the
489 following occur:
490 a. The goods or services being purchased, including
491 those purchased through a lease/purchase agreement, or leased
492 are available as a result of a competitive bid process
493 conducted by a governmental entity whose award complies with
494 Section 16-13B-1(a) and is approved by the Department of
495 Examiners of Public Accounts for each bid.
496 b. The goods or services are either not at the time
497 available to local boards of education on the state purchasing
498 program or are available at a price equal to or less than that
499 on the state purchasing program.
500 c. The purchase, lease, or lease/purchase is made
501 through a participating Alabama vendor holding an Alabama
502 business license if such a vendor exists.
503 (14) Purchases of unprocessed agricultural products as
504 defined in subsection (b) of Section 16-1-46 and the cost of
Page 18

defined in subsection (b) of Section 16-1-46 and the cost of
SB75 Engrossed
505 the food purchased is equal to or less than the federal
506 simplified acquisition threshold set in 2 C.F.R. § 200.88.
507 (15) Purchase of goods or services, other than voice or
508 data wireless communication services, from vendors that have
509 been awarded a current and valid general services
510 administration contract. Prices paid for the goods or services
511 may not exceed the lowest competitively bid price for these
512 goods or services, other than voice or data wireless
513 communication services, and may not exceed the price on an
514 existing state purchasing program.
515 (b) This chapter shall not apply to:
516 (1) Any purchases of products where the price of the
517 products is already regulated and established by state law.
518 (2) Purchases made by individual schools of the county
519 or municipal public school systems from monies other than
520 those raised by taxation or received through appropriations
521 from state or county sources.
522 (c) The city and county boards of education shall
523 establish and maintain the purchasing facilities and
524 procedures as may be necessary to carry out the intent and
525 purpose of this chapter by complying with the requirements for
526 competitive bidding in the operation and management of each
527 city and county board of education.
528 (d) Contracts entered into in violation of this chapter
529 shall be void, and any person who violates this chapter shall
530 be guilty of a Class C felony."
531 Section 4. Section 41-4-171, Code of Alabama 1975, is
532 amended to read as follows:
Page 19

amended to read as follows:
SB75 Engrossed
533 "§41-4-171
534 (a) A public procurement unit that is governed by this
535 article may either participate in, sponsor, conduct, or
536 administer a cooperative purchasing agreement for the
537 procurement of any supplies or services with one or more
538 public procurement units in accordance with an agreement
539 entered into between the participants. The cooperative
540 purchasing agreement may include joint or multi-party
541 contracts between public procurement units and open-ended
542 public procurement unit contracts that are made available to
543 other public procurement units.
544 (b) All cooperative purchasing conducted under this
545 division shall be through contracts awarded using source
546 selection methods substantially equivalent to those specified
547 in Division 3."
548 Section 5. This act shall become effective on October
549 1, 2026.
Page 20

1, 2026.
SB75 Engrossed
550
551
552 Senate
553 Read for the first time and referred ................13-Jan-26
554 to the Senate committee on Education
555 Policy
556
557 Read for the second time and placed ................05-Feb-26
558 on the calendar:
559 1 amendment
560
561 Read for the third time and passed ................17-Mar-26
562 as amended
563 Yeas 31
564 Nays 0
565 Abstains 0
566
567
568 Patrick Harris,
569 Secretary.
570
Page 21